Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202047-1001
Act, how cited.

Sections 47-1001 to 47-1007 shall be known and may be cited as the Healthy Pregnancies for Incarcerated Women Act.

Laws 2019, LB690, § 1.